Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.68.080

Misconduct of board—Number of votes affected—Enough to change result.

When any election for an office exercised in and for a county is contested on account of any malconduct on the part of a county canvassing board, or any member thereof, the election shall not be annulled and set aside upon any proof thereof, unless the rejection of the vote of such precinct or precincts will change the result as to such office or measure in the remaining vote of the county.

[ 2016 c 130 s 7; 2011 c 10 s 66; 2003 c 111 s 1708. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.65.070; prior: Code 1881 s 3107; 1865 p 43 s 3; RRS s 5368. Formerly RCW 29.65.070.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.